Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5484.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 102. In the case of The taxable income of a taxpayer whose income-producing activities are confined solely to this state , the entire taxable income of such taxpayer shall must be allocated to this state, except as otherwise expressly provided in this part.chapter. Sec. 103. Any A taxpayer having income from business activity which is taxable both within and without outside of this state, other than the rendering of purely personal services by an individual, shall allocate and apportion his the taxpayer's net income as provided in this part.chapter. Sec. 105. For purposes of allocation and apportionment of income from business activity under this part, chapter, a taxpayer is taxable subject to tax in another state if (a) in that state he either of the following circumstances: (a) The taxpayer is subject to a net income tax, a franchise tax measured by net income, a franchise tax for the privilege of doing business or a corporate stock tax. , or (b) that (b) That state has jurisdiction to subject the taxpayer to a net income tax 1 or more of the taxes listed in subdivision (a) regardless of whether , in fact, the that state does or does not subject the taxpayer to that tax. Sec. 110. (1) For a resident individual, estate, or trust, all taxable income from any source whatsoever, except that attributable to another state under sections 111 to 115 this chapter and subject to section 255, is allocated to this state. (2) For a nonresident individual, estate, or trust, all taxable income is allocated to this state to the extent it is earned, received, or acquired in 1 or more of the following ways: (a) For the rendition of personal services performed in this state. (b) As a distributive share of the net profits of a business, profession, enterprise, undertaking, or other activity as the result of work done, services rendered, or other business activities conducted in this state, except as allocated to another state pursuant to sections 111 to 114 under this chapter and subject to section 256. (c) For tax years beginning after 1996, as As a prize won by the taxpayer under the McCauley-Traxler-Law-Bowman-McNeely lottery act, 1972 PA 239, MCL 432.1 to 432.47. (d) As winnings that are proceeds of a wagering transaction paid on or after October 1, 2003 by a casino or as a payoff price on a winning ticket that is the result of pari-mutuel wagering at a licensed race meeting if the casino or licensed race meeting is located in this state. As used in this subdivision: (i) "Casino" means a casino regulated by this state under the Michigan gaming control and revenue act, Gaming Control and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.201 to 432.226, or a building on Native American land or land held in trust by the United States for a federally recognized Indian tribe on which gaming is conducted under the Indian gaming regulatory act, Public Law 100-497, 102 Stat 2467.25 USC 2701 to 2721. (ii) "Pari-mutuel wagering" and "licensed race meeting" mean those terms as used in the horse racing law of 1995, 1995 PA 279, MCL 431.301 to 431.336. (3) The respective shares of a nonresident estate or trust and its beneficiaries, including, solely for purposes of allocation, resident and nonresident beneficiaries, in the income attributable to this state shall must be in proportion to the respective shares of distributable net income of the beneficiaries under the internal revenue code. If the estate or trust has no distributable net income for the tax year, the share of each beneficiary in the income attributable to this state shall must be in proportion to his or her each beneficiary's share of the estate or trust income for that year, under local law or the terms of the instrument, that is required to be distributed currently and other amounts of the income distributed in the year. Any balance of the income attributable to this state shall be allocated to the estate or trust. (4) Rents and royalties from real or tangible personal property, capital gains, interest, dividends, or patent or copyright royalties, to the extent that they constitute a nonbusiness income, shall must be allocated as provided in sections 111 to 114.under this chapter. Sec. 112. (1) Capital gains and losses from sales or exchanges of real property located in this state are allocable to this state. (2) Capital gains and losses from sales or exchanges of tangible personal property are allocable to this state if:in either of the following circumstances: (a) The property had a situs in this state at the time of the sale. ; or (b) The taxpayer is a resident partnership, member of a flow-through entity, estate or trust or individual of this state or has a commercial domicile in this state and the taxpayer is not taxable in the state in which the property had a situs. (3) Capital Except as otherwise provided under this subsection, capital gains and losses from sales or exchanges of intangible personal property are allocable to this state if the taxpayer is a resident partnership, member of a flow-through entity, estate or trust or individual of this state or has a commercial domicile in this state. For a taxpayer that is member of a flow-through entity, capital gains and losses from the sale of intangible personal property, the sale of which is business income, must be included in the numerator of the sales factor based upon the sales factor of the selling entity. Sec. 115. (1) Before January 1, 2012, all business income, other than income from transportation services, shall be apportioned to this state by multiplying the income by a fraction, the numerator of which is the property factor plus the payroll factor plus the sales factor, and the denominator of which is 3. (2) After December 31, 2011, all All business income, other than income from transportation services, shall must be apportioned to this state by multiplying the income by the sales factor calculated under section 121. Sec. 122. (1) Sales Before January 1, 2026, sales of tangible personal property are in this state ifin either of the following circumstances: (a) The property is delivered or shipped to a purchaser, other than the United States government, within this state regardless of the f.o.b. point or other conditions of the sale. ; or (b) The property is shipped from an office, store, warehouse, factory or other place of storage in this state and (i) the purchaser is the United States government or (ii) the taxpayer is not taxable in the state of the purchaser. (2) On and after January 1, 2026, sales of the taxpayer in this state are determined as follows: (a) Sales of tangible personal property are in this state if the property is shipped or delivered, or, in the case of electricity and gas, the contract requires the property to be shipped or delivered, to any purchaser within this state based on the ultimate destination at the point that the property comes to rest regardless of the free on board point or other conditions of the sales. Property stored in transit for 60 days or more prior to receipt by the purchaser or the purchaser's designee, or in the case of a dock sale not picked up for 60 days or more, is deemed to have come to rest at this ultimate destination. Property stored in transit for fewer than 60 days prior to receipt by the purchaser or the purchaser's designee, or in the case of a dock sale picked up before 60 days, is not deemed to have come to rest at this ultimate destination. For purposes of this subsection: (i) "Dock sale" means a sale in which the purchaser uses its own or rented vehicles, or makes arrangements with a carrier, to pick up the property at the seller's location. (ii) "Stored in transit" means storing, staging, forwarding, or consolidating activities undertaken for further shipment or transfer of the property to the purchaser or purchaser's designee. (b) Receipts from the sale, lease, rental, or licensing of real property are in this state if that property is located in this state. (c) Receipts from the lease or rental of tangible personal property are sales in this state to the extent that the property is utilized in this state. The extent of utilization of tangible personal property in this state is determined by multiplying the receipts by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days of physical location of the property in this state during the lease or rental period in the tax year and the denominator of which is the number of days of physical location of the property everywhere during all lease or rental periods in the tax year. If the physical location of the property during the lease or rental period is unknown or cannot be determined, the tangible personal property is utilized in the state in which the property was located at the time the lease or rental payer obtained possession. (d) Receipts from the lease or rental of mobile transportation property owned by the taxpayer are in this state to the extent that the property is used in this state. The extent to which an aircraft will be deemed to be used in this state and the amount of receipts that is to be included in the numerator of this state's sales factor are determined by multiplying all the receipts from the lease or rental of the aircraft by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of landings of the aircraft in this state and the denominator of which is the total number of landings of the aircraft. If the extent of the use of any transportation property within this state cannot be determined, then the receipts are in this state if the property has its principal base of operations in this state. (e) Royalties and other income received for the use of or for the privilege of using intangible property, including patents, know-how, formulas, designs, processes, patterns, copyrights, trade names, service names, franchises, licenses, contracts, customer lists, custom computer software, or similar items, are attributed to the state in which the property is used by the purchaser. If the property is used in more than 1 state, the royalties or other income must be apportioned to this state pro rata according to the portion of use in this state. If the portion of use in this state cannot be determined, the royalties or other income must be excluded from both the numerator and the denominator. Intangible property is used in this state if the purchaser uses the intangible property or the rights to the intangible property in the regular course of its business operations in this state, regardless of the location of the purchaser's customers. Sec. 123. (1) Sales, Before January 1, 2026, sales, other than sales of tangible personal property, are in this state if:in either of the following circumstances: (a) The income-producing activity is performed in this state. ; or (b) The income-producing activity is performed both in and outside this state and a greater proportion of the income-producing activity is performed in this state than outside this state, based on costs of performance. (2) On and after January 1, 2026, sales from the performance of services are in this state and attributable to this state as follows: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, all receipts from the performance of services are included in the numerator of the sales factor if the recipient of the services receives all of the benefit of the services in this state. If the recipient of the services receives some of the benefit of the services in this state, the receipts are included in the numerator of the sales factor in proportion to the extent that the recipient receives benefit of the services in this state. (b) Sales derived from securities brokerage services attributable to this state are determined by multiplying the total dollar amount of receipts from securities brokerage services by a fraction, the numerator of which is the sales of securities brokerage services to customers within this state, and the denominator of which is the sales of securities brokerage services to all customers. Receipts from securities brokerage services include commissions on transactions, the spread earned on principal transactions in which the broker buys or sells from its account, total margin interest paid on behalf of brokerage accounts owned by the broker's customers, and fees and receipts of all kinds from the underwriting of securities. If receipts from brokerage services can be associated with a particular customer, but it is impractical to associate the receipts with the address of the customer, then the address of the customer is presumed to be the address of the branch office that generates the transactions for the customer. (c) Sales of services that are derived directly or indirectly from the sale of management, distribution, administration, or securities brokerage services to, or on behalf of, a regulated investment company or its beneficial owners, including receipts derived directly or indirectly from trustees, sponsors, or participants of employee benefit plans that have accounts in a regulated investment company, are attributable to this state to the extent that the shareholders of the regulated investment company are domiciled within this state. For purposes of this subdivision, "domicile" means the shareholder's mailing address on the records of the regulated investment company. If the regulated investment company or the person providing management services to the regulated investment company has actual knowledge that the shareholder's primary residence or principal place of business is different than the shareholder's mailing address, then the shareholder's primary residence or principal place of business is the shareholder's domicile. A separate computation must be made with respect to the receipts derived from each regulated investment company. The total amount of sales attributable to this state must be equal to the total receipts received by each regulated investment company multiplied by a fraction determined as follows: (i) The numerator of the fraction is the average of the sum of the beginning-of-year and end-of-year number of shares owned by the regulated investment company shareholders who have their domicile in this state. (ii) The denominator of the fraction is the average of the sum of the beginning-of-year and end-of-year number of shares owned by all shareholders. (iii) For purposes of the fraction, the year is the tax year of the regulated investment company that ends with or within the tax year of the taxpayer. (3) Receipts from the origination of a loan or gains from the sale of a loan secured by residential real property are deemed a sale in this state only if 1 or more of the following apply: (a) The real property is located in this state. (b) The real property is located both within this state and 1 or more other states and more than 50% of the fair market value of the real property is located within this state. (c) More than 50% of the real property is not located in any 1 state and the borrower is located in this state. (4) Interest from loans secured by real property is in this state if the property is located within this state, if the property is located both within this state and 1 or more other states and if more than 50% of the fair market value of the real property is located within this state, or if more than 50% of the fair market value of the real property is not located within any 1 state but the borrower is located in this state. The determination of whether the real property securing a loan is located within this state must be made as of the time the original agreement was made and any and all subsequent substitutions of collateral shall be disregarded. (5) Interest from a loan not secured by real property is in this state if the borrower is located in this state. (6) Gains from the sale of a loan not secured by real property, including income recorded under the coupon stripping rules of section 1286 of the internal revenue code, are in this state if the borrower is in this state. (7) Receipts from credit card receivables, including interest, fees, and penalties from credit card receivables and receipts from fees charged to cardholders, such as annual fees, are in this state if the billing address of the cardholder is in this state. (8) Receipts from the sale of credit card or other receivables are in this state if the billing address of the customer is in this state. Credit card issuer's reimbursement fees are in this state if the billing address of the cardholder is in this state. Receipts from merchant discounts, computed net of any cardholder chargebacks, but not reduced by any interchange transaction fees or by any issuer's reimbursement fees paid to another for charges made by its cardholders, are in this state if the commercial domicile of the merchant is in this state. (9) Loan servicing fees derived from loans of another secured by real property are in this state if the real property is located in this state, if the real property is located both within and outside of this state and 1 or more states if more than 50% of the fair market value of the real property is located in this state, or if more than 50% of the fair market value of the real property is not located in any 1 state but the borrower is located in this state. Loan servicing fees derived from loans of another not secured by real property are in this state if the borrower is located in this state. If the location of the security cannot be determined, then loan servicing fees for servicing either the secured or the unsecured loans of another are in this state if the lender to whom the loan servicing service is provided is located in this state. (10) Receipts from the sale of securities and other assets from investment and trading activities, including, but not limited to, interest, dividends, and gains, are in this state in either of the following circumstances: (a) The person's customer is in this state. (b) If the location of the person's customer cannot be determined, both of the following apply: (i) Interest, dividends, and other income from investment assets and activities and from trading assets and activities, including, but not limited to, investment securities; trading account assets; federal funds; securities purchased and sold under agreements to resell or repurchase; options; futures contracts; forward contracts; notional principal contracts such as swaps; equities; and foreign currency transactions are in this state if the average value of the assets is assigned to a regular place of business of the taxpayer within this state. Interest from federal funds sold and purchased and from securities purchased under resale agreements and securities sold under repurchase agreements is in this state if the average value of the assets is assigned to a regular place of business of the taxpayer within this state. The amount of receipts and other income from investment assets and activities is in this state if assets are assigned to a regular place of business of the taxpayer within this state. (ii) The amount of receipts from trading assets and activities, including, but not limited to, assets and activities in the matched book, in the arbitrage book, and foreign currency transactions, but excluding amounts otherwise sourced in this section, is in this state if the assets are assigned to a regular place of business of the taxpayer within this state. (11) Receipts from transportation services rendered by a person subject to tax in another state are in this state and shall be attributable to this state as follows: (a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b) through (e), receipts must be proportioned based on the ratio of revenue miles of the person in this state to the revenue miles of the person everywhere. (b) Receipts from maritime transportation services are attributable to this state as follows: (i) 50% of those receipts that either originate or terminate in this state. (ii) 100% of those receipts that both originate and terminate in this state. (c) Receipts attributable to this state of a person whose business activity consists of the transportation both of property and of individuals must be proportioned based on the total receipts for passenger miles and ton mile fractions, separately computed and individually weighted by the ratio of receipts from passenger transportation to total receipts from all transportation, and by the ratio of receipts from freight transportation to total receipts from all transportation, respectively. (d) Receipts attributable to this state of a person whose business activity consists of the transportation of oil by pipeline must be proportioned based on the ratio of the receipts for the barrel miles transported in this state to the receipts for the barrel miles transported by the person everywhere. (e) Receipts attributable to this state of a person whose business activities consist of the transportation of gas by pipeline must be proportioned based on the ratio of the receipts for the 1,000 cubic feet miles transported in this state to the receipts for the 1,000 cubic feet miles transported by the person everywhere. (12) For purposes of subsection (11), if a taxpayer can show that revenue mile information is not available or cannot be obtained without unreasonable expense to the taxpayer, receipts attributable to this state must be that portion of the revenue derived from transportation services performed everywhere that the miles of transportation services performed in this state bear to the miles of transportation services performed everywhere. If the department determines that the information required for the calculations under subsection (11) is not available or cannot be obtained without unreasonable expense to the taxpayer, the department may use other available information that in the opinion of the department will result in an equitable allocation of the taxpayer's receipts to this state. (13) Except as provided in subsections (14) through (19), receipts from the sale of telecommunications service or mobile telecommunications service are in this state if the customer's place of primary use of the service is in this state. As used in this subsection, "place of primary use" means the customer's residential street address or primary business street address where the customer's use of the telecommunications service primarily occurs. For mobile telecommunications service, the customer's residential street address or primary business street address is the place of primary use only if it is within the licensed service area of the customer's home service provider. (14) Receipts from the sale of telecommunications service sold on an individual call-by-call basis are in this state if either of the following applies: (a) The call both originates and terminates in this state. (b) The call either originates or terminates in this state and the service address is located in this state. (15) Receipts from the sale of postpaid telecommunications service are in this state if the origination point of the telecommunication signal, as first identified by the service provider's telecommunication system or as identified by information received by the seller from its service provider if the system used to transport telecommunication signals is not the seller's, is located in this state. (16) Receipts from the sale of prepaid telecommunications service or prepaid mobile telecommunications service are in this state if the purchaser obtains the prepaid card or similar means of conveyance at a location in this state. Receipts from recharging a prepaid telecommunications service or mobile telecommunications service are in this state if the purchaser's billing information indicates a location in this state. (17) Receipts from the sale of private communication services are in this state as follows: (a) 100% of the receipts from the sale of each channel termination point within this state. (b) 100% of the receipts from the sale of the total channel mileage between each termination point within this state. (c) 50% of the receipts from the sale of service segments for a channel between 2 customer channel termination points, 1 of which is located in this state and the other is located outside of this state, which segments are separately charged. (d) The receipts from the sale of service for segments with a channel termination point located in this state and in 2 or more other states or equivalent jurisdictions, and which segments are not separately billed, are in this state based on a percentage determined by dividing the number of customer channel termination points in this state by the total number of customer channel termination points. (18) Receipts from the sale of billing services and ancillary services for telecommunications service are in this state based on the location of the purchaser's customers. If the location of the purchaser's customers is not known or cannot be determined, the sale of billing services and ancillary services for telecommunications service is in this state based on the location of the purchaser. (19) Receipts to access a carrier's network or from the sale of telecommunications services for resale are in this state as follows: (a) 100% of the receipts from access fees attributable to intrastate telecommunications service that both originates and terminates in this state. (b) 50% of the receipts from access fees attributable to interstate telecommunications service if the interstate call either originates or terminates in this state. (c) 100% of the receipts from interstate end user access line charges, if the customer's service address is in this state. As used in this subdivision, "interstate end user access line charges" includes, but is not limited to, the surcharge approved by the Federal Communications Commission and levied pursuant to 47 CFR part 69. (d) Gross receipts from sales of telecommunications services to other telecommunication service providers for resale shall be sourced to this state using the apportionment concepts used for nonresale receipts of telecommunications services if the information is readily available to make that determination. If the information is not readily available, then the taxpayer may use any other reasonable and consistent method. (20) Except as otherwise provided under this subsection, for a taxpayer whose business activities include live radio or television programming as described in subsector code 7922 of industry group 792 under the standard industrial classification code as compiled by the United States Department of Labor or are included in industry group 483, 484, 781, or 782 under the standard industrial classification code as compiled by the United States Department of Labor, or any combination of the business activities included in those groups, media receipts are in this state and attributable to this state only if the commercial domicile of the customer is in this state and the customer has a direct connection or relationship with the taxpayer pursuant to a contract under which the media receipts are derived. For media receipts from the sale of advertising, if the customer of that advertising is commercially domiciled in this state and receives some of the benefit of the sale of that advertising in this state, the media receipts from the advertising to that customer are included in the numerator of the sales factor in proportion to the extent that the customer receives the benefit of the advertising in this state. For purposes of this subsection, if the taxpayer is a broadcaster and if the customer receives some of the benefit of the advertising in this state, the media receipts for that sale of advertising from that customer must be proportioned based on the ratio that the broadcaster's viewing or listening audience in this state bears to its total viewing or listening audience everywhere. As used in this subsection: (a) "Media property" means motion pictures, television programs, internet programs and websites, other audiovisual works, and any other similar property embodying words, ideas, concepts, images, or sound without regard to the means or methods of distribution or the medium in which the property is embodied. (b) "Media receipts" means receipts from the sale, license, broadcast, transmission, distribution, exhibition, or other use of media property and receipts from the sale of media services. Media receipts do not include receipts from the sale of media property that is a consumer product that is ultimately sold at retail. (c) "Media services" means services in which the use of the media property is integral to the performance of those services. (21) Terms used in subsections (13) through (20) have the same meaning as those terms defined in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement administered under the streamlined sales and use tax administration act, 2004 PA 174, MCL 205.801 to 205.833. (22) For purposes of this section, a borrower is considered located in this state if the borrower's billing address is in this state. Enacting section 1. Sections 111, 113, 114, 131, 132, 133, and 134 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.111, 206.113, 206.114, 206.131, 206.132, 206.133, and 206.134, are repealed.